Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-3,101
Prosecution of separate acts.

Assault on a pregnant woman and assault on her unborn child shall be considered as separate acts or conduct for purposes of prosecution.

Laws 2006, LB 57, § 8.